Utah statutes.
26-2-12.5.   Certified copies of birth certificates -- Fees credited to
Children's Trust Account.
(1)  In addition to the fees provided for in Section 26-1-6, the department
and local registrars authorized to issue certified copies shall charge an
additional $3 fee for each certified copy of a birth certificate, including
certified copies of supplementary and amended birth certificates, under
Sections 26-2-8 through 26-2-11. This additional fee may be charged only for
the first copy requested at any one time.
(2)  The fee shall be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer and credited
to the Children's Trust Account established in Section 62A-4a-309.
